sl-SI: Material leče/diapozitiva: Steklo; Plastika; Drugo
ro-RO: Material lentile/diapozitive: Sticlă; Plastic; Altele
pt-BR: Material da lente/lâmina: Vidro; Plástico; Outro
da: Materiale til linse/objektglas: Glas; Plast; Andet
pt-PT: Material da lente/slide: Vidro; Plástico; Outro
ja: レンズ/スライド素材: ガラス; プラスチック; その他
zh-CN: 镜片/载玻片材质: 玻璃; 塑料; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál šošovky/sklíčka: Sklo; Plast; Iné
nb: Linse-/lysbildemateriale: Glass; Plast; Annet
hu: Lencse/dia anyaga: Üveg; Műanyag; Egyéb
nl: Materiaal lens/dia: Glas; Plastic; Andere
ru: Материал линз/слайдов: Стеклянные; Пластик; Другое
fi: Linssi-/liukumateriaali: Lasi; Muovi; Muu
de: Linsen-/Diamaterial: Glas; Kunststoff; Sonstiges
cs: Materiál čočky/sklíčka: Sklo; Plast; Jiné
ko: 렌즈/슬라이드 소재: 유리; 플라스틱; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal objektiva/poklopca: Staklo; Plastika; Ostalo
vi: Vật liệu ống kính: Thủy tinh; Nhựa; Khác
it: Materiale delle lenti/diapositive: Vetro; Plastica; Altro
zh-TW: 鏡頭/幻燈片材料: 玻璃; 塑膠; 其他
fr: Matériau de la lentille/lame: Verre; Plastique; Autre
en: Lens/Slide material: Glass; Plastic; Other
es: Material de la lente/diapositiva: Vidrio; Plástico; Otros
pl: Materiał soczewki/szkiełka: Szkło; Tworzywo sztuczne; Inne
lt-LT: Objektyvo / stiklelio medžiaga: Stiklas; Plastikas; Kita
tr: Lens/Slayt malzemesi: Cam; Plastik; Diğer
el: Υλικό φακού/διαφάνειας: Γυαλί; Πλαστικό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал на лещата/диапозитива: Стъкло; Пластмаса; Други
th: วัสดุเลนส์/สไลด์: แก้ว; พลาสติก; อื่นๆ
sv: Objektiv/objektglas - material: Glas; Plast; Övrigt